Massachusetts, session 194th, H3470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b)(1) of Section 4 of chapter 150F of the General Laws is
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
Since the obligation to negotiate in good faith includes an obligation to provide requested
information that relates to the bargaining process, it is also an unfair work practice for a certified
or recognized transportation network driver organization to refuse to provide information
requested by a transportation network company that is relevant to the bargaining process.
SECTION 2. Chapter 150F of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 13. Any record furnished to the board or other state agency by a transportation
network company pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to, transportation network
driver records, shall not be considered a public record as defined in clause twenty-sixth of
of 3

section 7 of Chapter 4 or Chapter 66. Such records are confidential and shall not be disclosed by
the board or by any persons who may be authorized by the board to control or process them
solely for purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 3. The board, as defined by section 2 of Chapter 150F, shall promulgate
regulations to implement Chapter 150F no later than December 31, 2025. The board shall
implement such regulations no later than June 30, 2026. Chapter 150F shall take effect upon the
board’s implementation of the regulations required by this section. The regulations shall: (a)
establish the obligations and procedures for the board and transportation network driver
organizations to protect transportation network driver data from public disclosure and
unauthorized use, including: (i) minimization of data collected to what is necessary under
Chapter 150F; (ii) encryption standards adhering to recognized security protocols; (iii) access
controls to ensure that only authorized persons can view or process driver data; (iv) data
retention policy; (v) auditing and compliance monitoring; (vi) data breach protocol; (vii) driver
notification of data sharing; (viii) driver consent and driver opt-out of data sharing; and (ix)
limitations on data use; (x) limiting the disclosure of driver personal identifying information to
the confidential uses necessary to effectuate Chapter 150F and not for the purpose of enforcing
federal immigration law or provided to an agency that primarily enforces immigration law,
unless the Board is provided with a lawful court order or judicial warrant signed by a judge
appointed pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution, a federal grand jury or trial
subpoena, or as otherwise required by federal law; (b) establish authorization card requirements,
including the specific form and content of authorization cards and authorization revocation cards,
receipt records, language access and limited English proficiency protections, authentication
standards for both electronic and non-electronic authorization cards, data security, submission
of 3

requirements, and the board’s audit review authority; (c) establish procedures for verifying
transportation network driver organization representation evidence; (d) establish procedures for
verifying that “active transportation network drivers,” as defined in section 2 of Chapter 150F,
includes only those independent contractors currently authorized to provide Transportation
Network Company services by the Transportation Network Company Division of the
Department of Public Utilities (DPU), who hold a current Background Check Clearance
Certificate, meet all safety and suitability standards required by DPU regulations, are affiliated
with an entity holding a current DPU permit, and use non-commercial vehicles to provide
transportation network company services; (e) establish how the median number of rides by
authorized transportation network drivers will be determined to set the quarterly active
transportation network driver thresholds; (f) establish the specific subjects of bargaining under
terms and conditions of work; (g) establish election procedures for exclusive bargaining
representations; specify how and when transportation network companies must share driver data
with transportation network driver organizations while protecting drivers’ privacy and complying
with data security laws; (h) establish complaint and grievance processes; (i) establish mediation
and arbitration rules; and (j) establish standards and procedures for board oversight of bargaining
agreements.
of 3